North Carolina, session 2025, HB436.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 153A-199 reads as rewritten:
"§ 153A-199. Payment of assessments in full or by installments.
(a) Within 30 days after the day that notice of confirmation of the assessment roll is
published, each owner of assessed property shall pay his assessment in full, unless the board of
commissioners has provided that assessments may be paid in semiannual or annual installments.
If payment by installments is permitted, any portion of an assessment not paid within the 30-day
period shall be paid in semiannual or annual installments. The board shall in the assessment
resolution determine whether payment may be made by semiannual or annual installments and
set the number of installments, which may not be more than 10. 40 for semiannual installments
or 20 for annual installments.
(b) With respect to payment by installment, the board may providepayment:
(1) By semiannual installments, the board may provide either:
a. That the first installment with interest is due on the date when property
taxes are due, and one installment with interest is due on the same date
in each successive six-month time period until the assessment is paid
in full.
b. That the first installment with interest is due 60 days after the date that
the assessment roll is confirmed, and future installments with interest
are due on that same day in each successive six-month time period
until the assessment is paid in full.
(2) By annual installments, the board may provide either:
(1)a. That the first installment with interest is due on the date when property
taxes are due, and one installment with interest is due on the same date
in each successive year until the assessment is paid in full, orfull.
(2)b. That the first installment with interest is due 60 days after the date that
the assessment roll is confirmed, and one installment with interest is
due on that same day in each successive year until the assessment is
paid in full."
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to assessments
for which the assessment roll is confirmed on or after that date.
*H436-v-1*